District of Columbia statutes.
22-1008

Relief of impounded animals.

In case any creature shall be at any time impounded as aforesaid, and shall continue to be without necessary food and water for more than 12 successive hours, it shall be lawful for any officer of the Washington Humane Society, from time to time, and as often as it shall be necessary, to enter into and upon any pound in which such creature shall be so confined, and supply it with necessary food and water so long as it shall remain so confined; such person shall not be liable to any action for such entry, and the reasonable cost for such food and water may be collected of the owner of such creature, and the said creature shall not be exempt from levy and sale upon execution issued upon a judgment thereof.

History

Aug. 23, 1871, Leg. Assem., p. 137, ch. 106, § 8
Feb. 13, 1885, 23 Stat. 302, ch. 58, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-808.
1973 Ed., § 22-808.